Hawaii statutes.
[§663-8.7] Limitation on pain and
suffering. Damages recoverable for pain and suffering as defined in
section 663-8.5 shall be limited to a maximum award of $375,000; provided that
this limitation shall not apply to tort actions enumerated in section 663-10.9(2).
[L Sp 1986, c 2, §20; am L 1989, c 300, §2; am L 1991, c 62, §1; am L 1993, c
238, §1; am L 1995, c 130, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Medical Malpractice in Hawai‘i: Tort Crisis or Crisis of
Medical Errors? 30 UH L. Rev. 167 (2007).

Kanahele v. Han: Economic Sufferings Legally Implies
Non-Economic Sufferings. 34 UH L. Rev. 611 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next